test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_vaddu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - váddu: # ok LAAVU
    váddu+N+Sg+Nom:  váddu
    váddu+N+Sg+Gen:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Acc:  váádu
    váddu+N+Sg+Ill:  váádun
    váddu+N+Sg+Loc:  váádust
    váddu+N+Sg+Com:  váddoin
    váddu+N+Sg+Abe:  váˊduttáá
    váddu+N+Ess:  váddun
    váddu+N+Par:  váddud
    váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááduh
    váddu+N+Pl+Gen: [váádui, váˊdui]
    váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááduid
    váddu+N+Pl+Ill:  váddoid
    váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááduin
    váddu+N+Pl+Com:  váˊduiguin
    váddu+N+Pl+Abe:  váˊduittáá

  Noun - nággu: # ok LAAVU
    nággu+N+Sg+Nom:  nággu
    nággu+N+Sg+Gen:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Acc:  náágu
    nággu+N+Sg+Ill:  náágun
    nággu+N+Sg+Loc:  náágust
    nággu+N+Sg+Com:  nággoin
    nággu+N+Sg+Abe:  náˊguttáá
    nággu+N+Ess:  nággun
    nággu+N+Par:  nággud
    nággu+N+Pl+Nom:  nááguh
    nággu+N+Pl+Gen: [náágui, náˊgui]
    nággu+N+Pl+Acc:  nááguid
    nággu+N+Pl+Ill:  nággoid
    nággu+N+Pl+Loc:  nááguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Com:  náˊguiguin
    nággu+N+Pl+Abe:  náˊguittáá

  Noun - táppu: # ok LAAVU
    táppu+N+Sg+Nom:  táppu
    táppu+N+Sg+Gen:  táápu
    táppu+N+Sg+Acc:  táápu
    táppu+N+Sg+Ill:  táápun
    táppu+N+Sg+Loc:  táápust
    táppu+N+Sg+Com:  táppoin
    táppu+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊputtáá
    táppu+N+Ess:  táppun
    táppu+N+Par:  táppud
    táppu+N+Pl+Nom:  táápuh
    táppu+N+Pl+Gen: [táápui, táˊpui]
    táppu+N+Pl+Acc:  táápuid
    táppu+N+Pl+Ill:  táppoid
    táppu+N+Pl+Loc:  táápuin
    táppu+N+Pl+Com:  táˊpuiguin
    táppu+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊpuittáá

  Noun - káttu: # ok LAAVU
    káttu+N+Sg+Nom:  káttu
    káttu+N+Sg+Gen:  káátu
    káttu+N+Sg+Acc:  káátu
    káttu+N+Sg+Ill:  káátun
    káttu+N+Sg+Loc:  káátust
    káttu+N+Sg+Com:  káttoin
    káttu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊtuttáá
    káttu+N+Ess:  káttun
    káttu+N+Par:  káttud
    káttu+N+Pl+Nom:  káátuh
    káttu+N+Pl+Gen: [káátui, káˊtui]
    káttu+N+Pl+Acc:  káátuid
    káttu+N+Pl+Ill:  káttoid
    káttu+N+Pl+Loc:  káátuin
    káttu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊtuiguin
    káttu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊtuittáá

  Noun - táttu: # ok LAAVU
    táttu+N+Sg+Nom:  táttu
    táttu+N+Sg+Gen:  táátu
    táttu+N+Sg+Acc:  táátu
    táttu+N+Sg+Ill:  táátun
    táttu+N+Sg+Loc:  táátust
    táttu+N+Sg+Com:  táttoin
    táttu+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊtuttáá
    táttu+N+Ess:  táttun
    táttu+N+Par:  táttud
    táttu+N+Pl+Nom:  táátuh
    táttu+N+Pl+Gen: [táátui, táˊtui]
    táttu+N+Pl+Acc:  táátuid
    táttu+N+Pl+Ill:  táttoid
    táttu+N+Pl+Loc:  táátuin
    táttu+N+Pl+Com:  táˊtuiguin
    táttu+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊtuittáá

  Noun - cuoppâ:
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuopˊpâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuopân
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuopâst
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Com: cuopˊpáin
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuoˊpâttáá
    cuoppâ+N+Ess: cuopˊpân
    cuoppâ+N+Par: cuopˊpâd
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuopah
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [cuopâi, cuoˊpâi]
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuopâid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuopˊpáid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuopâin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Com: cuoˊpâiguin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuoˊpâittáá

  Noun - ruossâ:
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruosˊsâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruosân
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruosâst
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Com: ruosˊsáin
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruoˊsâttáá
    ruossâ+N+Ess: ruosˊsân
    ruossâ+N+Par: ruosˊsâd
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruosah
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruosâi, ruoˊsâi]
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruosâid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruosˊsáid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruosâin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Com: ruoˊsâiguin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruoˊsâittáá

  Noun - cuozzâ:
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuozˊzâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuozân
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuozâst
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Com: cuozˊzáin
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuoˊzâttáá
    cuozzâ+N+Ess: cuozˊzân
    cuozzâ+N+Par: cuozˊzâd
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuozah
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Gen: [cuozâi, cuoˊzâi]
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuozâid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuozˊzáid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuozâin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Com: cuoˊzâiguin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuoˊzâittáá

  Noun - ristâ:
    ristâ+N+Sg+Nom: ristâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Gen: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Acc: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Ill: riistân
    ristâ+N+Sg+Loc: riistâst
    ristâ+N+Sg+Com: ristáin
    ristâ+N+Sg+Abe: riˊstâttáá
    ristâ+N+Ess: ristân
    ristâ+N+Par: ristâd
    ristâ+N+Pl+Nom: riistah
    ristâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riistâi, riˊstâi]
    ristâ+N+Pl+Acc: riistâid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Ill: ristáid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Loc: riistâin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Com: riˊstâiguin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Abe: riˊstâittáá

  Noun - kolbâ:
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Nom: kolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Gen: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Acc: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Ill: koolbân
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Loc: koolbâst
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Com: kolbáin
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊlbâttáá
    kolbâ+N+Ess: kolbân
    kolbâ+N+Par: kolbâd
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Nom: koolbah
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koolbâi, koˊlbâi]
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Acc: koolbâid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Ill: kolbáid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Loc: koolbâin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊlbâiguin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊlbâittáá

  Noun - muršâ:
    muršâ+N+Sg+Nom: muršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Gen: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Acc: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Ill: muuršân
    muršâ+N+Sg+Loc: muuršâst
    muršâ+N+Sg+Com: muršáin
    muršâ+N+Sg+Abe: muˊršâttáá
    muršâ+N+Ess: muršân
    muršâ+N+Par: muršâd
    muršâ+N+Pl+Nom: muuršah
    muršâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muuršâi, muˊršâi]
    muršâ+N+Pl+Acc: muuršâid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Ill: muršáid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Loc: muuršâin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Com: muˊršâiguin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Abe: muˊršâittáá

  Noun - rytmâ:
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Nom: rytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Gen: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Acc: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Ill: ryytmân
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Loc: ryytmâst
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Com: rytmáin
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Abe: ryˊtmâttáá
    rytmâ+N+Ess: rytmân
    rytmâ+N+Par: rytmâd
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Nom: ryytmah
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ryytmâi, ryˊtmâi]
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Acc: ryytmâid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Ill: rytmáid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Loc: ryytmâin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Com: ryˊtmâiguin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Abe: ryˊtmâittáá
    
  Noun - kállu: # ok KALLU
    kállu+N+Sg+Nom:  kállu
    kállu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááḷu
    kállu+N+Sg+Acc:  kááḷu
    kállu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááḷun
    kállu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááḷust
    kállu+N+Sg+Com:  kálloin
    kállu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊḷuttáá
    kállu+N+Ess:  kállun
    kállu+N+Par:  kállud
    kállu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááḷuh
    kállu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááḷui, káˊḷui]
    kállu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááḷuid
    kállu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálloid
    kállu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááḷuin
    kállu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊḷuiguin
    kállu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊḷuittáá

  Noun - pánnu: # ok KALLU
    pánnu+N+Sg+Nom:  pánnu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Gen:  pááṇu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Acc:  pááṇu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Ill:  pááṇun
    pánnu+N+Sg+Loc:  pááṇust
    pánnu+N+Sg+Com:  pánnoin
    pánnu+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊṇuttáá
    pánnu+N+Ess:  pánnun
    pánnu+N+Par:  pánnud
    pánnu+N+Pl+Nom:  pááṇuh
    pánnu+N+Pl+Gen: [pááṇui, páˊṇui]
    pánnu+N+Pl+Acc:  pááṇuid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Ill:  pánnoid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Loc:  pááṇuin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Com:  páˊṇuiguin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊṇuittáá

  Noun - muállu: # ok VUAGGU
    muállu+N+Sg+Nom:  muálˊlu
    muállu+N+Sg+Gen:  muáḷu
    muállu+N+Sg+Acc:  muáḷu
    muállu+N+Sg+Ill:  muáḷun
    muállu+N+Sg+Loc:  muáḷust
    muállu+N+Sg+Com:  muálˊloin
    muállu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáˊḷuttáá
    muállu+N+Ess:  muálˊlun
    muállu+N+Par:  muálˊlud
    muállu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáḷuh
    muállu+N+Pl+Gen:  [muáḷui, muáˊḷui]
    muállu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáḷuid
    muállu+N+Pl+Ill:  muálˊloid
    muállu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáḷuin
    muállu+N+Pl+Com:  muáˊḷuiguin
    muállu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáˊḷuittáá

  Noun - puállu: # ok KALLU
    puállu+N+Sg+Nom:  puálˊlu
    puállu+N+Sg+Gen:  puáḷu
    puállu+N+Sg+Acc:  puáḷu
    puállu+N+Sg+Ill:  puáḷun
    puállu+N+Sg+Loc:  puáḷust
    puállu+N+Sg+Com:  puálˊloin
    puállu+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊḷuttáá
    puállu+N+Ess:  puálˊlun
    puállu+N+Par:  puálˊlud
    puállu+N+Pl+Nom:  puáḷuh
    puállu+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáḷui, puáˊḷui]
    puállu+N+Pl+Acc:  puáḷuid
    puállu+N+Pl+Ill:  puálˊloid
    puállu+N+Pl+Loc:  puáḷuin
    puállu+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊḷuiguin
    puállu+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊḷuittáá

  Noun - máksu: # ok; SgCom + PlIll cehcked with Ilmari Mattus; IM: vs; MLO:    	vss; both are in use LAAVU
    máksu+N+Sg+Nom:  máksu
    máksu+N+Sg+Gen:  máávsu
    máksu+N+Sg+Acc:  máávsu
    máksu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááksun
    máksu+N+Sg+Loc:  máávsust
    máksu+N+Sg+Com:  [mávssoin, mávsoin]
    máksu+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊvsuttáá
    máksu+N+Ess:  máksun
    máksu+N+Par:  máksud
    máksu+N+Pl+Nom:  máávsuh
    máksu+N+Pl+Gen: [máávsui, máˊvsui]
    máksu+N+Pl+Acc:  máávsuid
    máksu+N+Pl+Ill:  [mávssoid, mávsoid]
    máksu+N+Pl+Loc:  máávsuin
    máksu+N+Pl+Com:  máˊvsuiguin
    máksu+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊvsuittáá

  Noun - riätká:
    riätká+N+Sg+Nom:  riätˊká
    riätká+N+Sg+Gen:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Acc:  riäđhá
    riätká+N+Sg+Ill:  riätkán
    riätká+N+Sg+Loc:  riäđhást
    riätká+N+Sg+Com:  riäđˊháin
    riätká+N+Sg+Abe:  riäˊđháttáá
    riätká+N+Ess:  riätˊkán
    riätká+N+Par:  riätˊkád
    riätká+N+Pl+Nom:  riäđháh
    riätká+N+Pl+Gen: [riäđhái, riäˊđhái]
    riätká+N+Pl+Acc:  riäđháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Ill:  riäđˊháid
    riätká+N+Pl+Loc:  riäđháin
    riätká+N+Pl+Com:  riäˊđháiguin
    riätká+N+Pl+Abe:  riäˊđháittáá
